Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1434.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6305(b)(2) introductory paragraph of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended, subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph and subsection (h) is amended by adding an introductory paragraph to read:§ 6305. Sale of tobacco products.* * *(b) Penalty.--* * *(2) [A] Except as provided in paragraph (4), a retailer that violates subsection (a) shall be sentenced as follows:* * *(4) A retailer that violates subsection (a) by selling 1234567891011121314151617 an electronic nicotine delivery system shall be sentenced as follows:(i) for a first or second offense, to pay a fine of $5,000; or(ii) for a third offense, to pay a fine of $5,000 and permanent revocation of the cigarette TOBACCO PRODUCTS TAX license. * * *(h) Administrative action.--Except as provided in subsection (b)(4):* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1434PN3716 - 2 - <--123456789101112